Utah statutes.
26-36a-207.   Restricted Special Revenue Fund -- Creation -- Deposits.

(1)  There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the "Hospital Provider Assessment Special Revenue Fund."

(2)  The fund shall consist of:

(a)  the assessments collected by the department under this chapter;

(b)  any interest and penalties levied with the administration of this chapter; and

(c)  any other funds received as donations for the restricted fund and appropriations from other sources.

(3)  Money in the fund shall be used:

(a)  to make inpatient hospital access payments under Section 26-36a-205; and

(b)  to reimburse money collected by the division from a hospital through a mistake made under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 179, 2010 General Session

